Mississippi, session 2026, HB1098.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The Ross Barnett Reservoir, which extends through portions of Hinds, Rankin, Madison, Scott and Leake Counties, shall be renamed the "B.B. King Reservoir." (2)  The Department of Finance and Administration in conjunction with the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District shall prepare or have prepared signage and distinctive plaques to be placed in prominent locations within each county of the reservoir basin displaying the "B.B. King Reservoir" which state the backgrounds, accomplishments and service to the state of B.B. King.  The Department of Finance and Administration, in conjunction with the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District, shall erect or cause to be erected proper lettering or signage on the outdoor facade of the reservoir control tower displaying the official name of the reservoir as the "B.B. King Reservoir."  The Department of Finance and Administration may expend all funds necessary to accomplish this act from funds appropriated by the Legislature for such purpose. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.